Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 1. Organization of State Procurement.

Sec. 36.30.005.
Centralization of procurement authority.

Except as otherwise provided, all rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of supplies, services, and professional services, and the control over supplies, services, and professional services vested in or exercised by an agency on January 1, 1988, are transferred to the commissioner of administration and to the chief procurement officer. Authority granted under this subsection shall be exercised in accordance with this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided, all rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of construction and procurements of equipment or services for the state equipment fleet and the control over construction of state facilities and the state equipment fleet vested in or exercised by an agency on January 1, 1988, are transferred to the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, subject to regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration. Notwithstanding AS

44.68.110

, authority relating to disposals from the state equipment fleet is vested in the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, subject to regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration. Authority granted under this subsection shall be exercised in accordance with this chapter.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, all rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction and the disposal of supplies for the University of Alaska are transferred to the Board of Regents. To the maximum extent possible, authority granted under this subsection shall be exercised in accordance with this chapter. The Board of Regents shall adopt regulations under this subsection that are substantially equivalent to the regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration to implement this chapter. For the purposes of this subsection, unless the context otherwise requires, in this chapter

“agency” means a subunit of the University of Alaska;

“attorney general” means the president of the University of Alaska;

“chief procurement officer” means a person designated by the president of the University of Alaska whose qualifications are substantially equivalent to those provided in AS

36.30.010(a)

;

“commissioner,” “commissioner of administration,” or “commissioner of transportation and public facilities” means the Board of Regents or the president of the University of Alaska if so designated by the Board of Regents by regulations adopted under this subsection; and

“department” means the University of Alaska.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

36.30.627

, the University of Alaska is not required to arbitrate construction contract claims unless the university specifically agrees to the arbitration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For emergency procurements, see 2 AAC 12, art. 9.

Sec. 36.30.010.
Chief procurement officer.

The commissioner shall appoint to the partially exempt service the chief procurement officer of the state. The chief procurement officer must have at least five years of prior experience in public procurement, including large scale procurement of supplies, services, or professional services, and must be a person with demonstrated executive and organizational ability. The chief procurement officer may be removed by the commissioner only for cause. The term of office of the chief procurement officer is six years.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the chief procurement officer shall

procure or supervise the procurement of all supplies, services, and professional services needed by an agency;

exercise general supervision and control over all inventories of supplies belonging to an agency and prescribe the manner in which supplies shall be purchased, delivered, stored, and distributed;

prescribe the time, manner, authentication, and form of making requisitions for supplies and services;

sell, trade, transfer between agencies, or otherwise dispose of surplus, obsolete, or unused supplies and make proper adjustments in the accounts of agencies concerned;

establish and maintain programs for the inspection, testing, and acceptance of supplies and services and the testing of samples submitted with bids;

prescribe standard forms for bids and contracts; and

provide for other matters that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter.

While a person performs the duties of the chief procurement officer under this chapter, the person may not be employed in or appointed to another position with the state.

The annual salary of the chief procurement officer is range 25 of the salary schedule established in AS

39.27.011

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 37 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Sec. 36.30.015.
Executive branch agencies.

The commissioner of transportation and public facilities may delegate to another agency the authority to contract for construction. Before delegating authority to an agency under this subsection, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall make a written determination that the agency is capable of implementing the delegated authority. Notwithstanding delegation of authority under this subsection, contracts for construction are governed by this chapter and regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration under this chapter.

The commissioner of administration may delegate to an agency the authority to contract for and manage services, professional services, and supplies. Notwithstanding delegation of authority under this subsection, an agency’s exercise of the authority is governed by this chapter and regulations adopted by the commissioner under this chapter. Before delegating authority to an agency under this subsection, the commissioner shall make a written determination that the agency is capable of implementing the delegated authority.

[Repealed, § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996.]

An agency may not contract for the services of legal counsel without the approval of the attorney general. An agency may not contract for the services of a hearing officer or administrative law judge for an administrative, quasi-judicial hearing without the approval of the attorney general and the chief administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

).

The board of directors of the Alaska Railroad Corporation and the board of directors of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation shall adopt procedures to govern the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction. The procedures must be substantially equivalent to the procedures prescribed in this chapter and in regulations adopted under this chapter. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subsection, the Alaska Railroad Corporation and the Alaska Aerospace Corporation shall comply with the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

, and, when the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities authorizes the Alaska Railroad Corporation to perform construction work instead of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, the Alaska Railroad Corporation shall use competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals under AS

36.30.100

—

36.30.270

to procure the supplies, services, professional services, and construction services necessary for the work and, to ensure the state obtains the lowest cost for the project, may submit a bid or proposal for the work.

The board of directors of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, notwithstanding AS

18.56.088

, the membership of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority, notwithstanding AS

44.88.085

, and the board of directors of the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority under AS

19.75.111

, shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), and the board of trustees of the Alaska Retirement Management Board shall adopt regulations under AS

37.10.240

, to govern the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction for the respective public corporation and board. The regulations must reflect competitive bidding principles and provide vendors reasonable and equitable opportunities to participate in the procurement process and must include procurement methods to meet emergency and extraordinary circumstances. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subsection, the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority, the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority, and the Alaska Retirement Management Board shall comply with the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall adopt regulations to manage the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction for the repair, maintenance, and reconstruction of vessels, docking facilities, and passenger and vehicle transfer facilities of the Alaska marine highway system. The regulations must be based on principles of competitive procurement consistent with this chapter to satisfy the special requirements of the Alaska marine highway system as determined by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

The board of directors of the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute shall adopt procedures to govern the procurement of supplies, services, and professional services. The procedures must be similar to the procedures prescribed in this chapter and in regulations adopted under this chapter, except that the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute shall comply with the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

.

Notwithstanding (e) of this section and the authority to delegate under (a) of this section, the Alaska Railroad Corporation, rather than the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, shall perform signalization and flagging work, may perform the signalization and flagging work by itself or by using contractors, and, if it decides to use contractors for the work, it shall obtain the contractors by using its procurement procedures adopted under (e) of this section.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, when a project of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities includes construction of rails, ties, or ballast for railroad tracks used by the Alaska Railroad Corporation, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may enter into an agreement with the Alaska Railroad Corporation for the Alaska Railroad Corporation to perform the work, and the Alaska Railroad Corporation may perform the work itself without procuring a contractor to provide the supplies, services, professional services, or construction services necessary for the work.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, the Public Defender Agency and the office of public advocacy are not required to obtain the approval of the attorney general to contract for the services of legal counsel in a matter where the attorney general is an adverse party.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 8, 9 ch 30 SLA 1990; am § 11 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 111 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 8 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1995; am §§ 2 — 4, 48 ch 137 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 73 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 51 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 177 SLA 2004; am § 54 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 9 ch 7 SLA 2011; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 59 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in subsection (f), “AS

19.75.111

” was substituted for “AS 44.90.111” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 44.90.111.

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Administrative Code. —

For source selection, see 2 AAC 12, art. 1.

For procurement, see 15 AAC 112, art. 2.

For appeals, see 15 AAC 150, art. 2.

For procurement, see 15 AAC 150, art. 3.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

For marine highway system procurement procedures, see 17 AAC 70, art. 3.

Sec. 36.30.020.
Legislature.

The legislative council shall adopt and publish procedures to govern the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction by the legislative branch. The procedures must be based on the competitive principles consistent with this chapter and must be adapted to the special needs of the legislative branch as determined by the legislative council. The procedures must contain provisions for prohibiting procurement from a person that has headquarters in a country listed in Tier 3 of the most recent Trafficking in Persons Report published by the United States Secretary of State under 22 U.S.C. 7107(b)(1)(C). The procedures may contain provisions for restricting procurement from a person that conducts business in but does not have headquarters in a country listed in Tier 3 of the most recent Trafficking in Persons Report published by the United States Secretary of State under 22 U.S.C. 7107(b)(1)(C). The procedures must be consistent with the provisions of AS

36.30.080(c)

— (e) and

36.30.085

. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the legislative agencies subject to the legislative council’s regulations shall comply with the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 181 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 2006; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Sec. 36.30.030.
Court system.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall adopt and publish procedures to govern the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction by the judicial branch. The procedures must be based on the competitive principles consistent with this chapter and must be adapted to the special needs of the judicial branch as determined by the administrative director of the Alaska Court System. The procedures must contain provisions for prohibiting procurement from a person that has headquarters in a country listed in Tier 3 of the most recent Trafficking in Persons Report published by the United States Secretary of State under 22 U.S.C. 7107(b)(1)(C). The procedures may contain provisions for restricting procurement from a person that conducts business in but does not have headquarters in a country listed in Tier 3 of the most recent Trafficking in Persons Report published by the United States Secretary of State under 22 U.S.C. 7107(b)(1)(C). The procedures must be consistent with the provisions of AS

36.30.080(c)

— (e) and

36.30.085

. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the judicial branch shall comply with the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 181 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 75 SLA 1994; am § 6 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 72 SLA 2006; am § 35 ch 8 SLA 2011; am § 10 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Sec. 36.30.040.
Procurement regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the procurement, management, and control of supplies, services, professional services, and construction by agencies. The regulations must contain provisions for prohibiting procurement from a person that has headquarters in a country listed in Tier 3 of the most recent Trafficking in Persons Report published by the United States Secretary of State under 22 U.S.C. 7107(b)(1)(C). The regulations may contain provisions for restricting procurement from a person that conducts business in but does not have headquarters in a country listed in Tier 3 of the most recent Trafficking in Persons Report published by the United States Secretary of State under 22 U.S.C. 7107(b)(1)(C). The commissioner may audit and monitor the implementation of the regulations and the requirements of this chapter with respect to using agencies.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations pertaining to

suspension, debarment, and reinstatement of prospective bidders and contractors;

bid protests;

conditions and procedures for the procurement of perishables and items for resale;

conditions and procedures for the use of source selection methods authorized by this chapter, including single source procurements, emergency procurements, and small procurements;

the opening or rejection of bids and offers, and waiver of informalities in bids and offers;

confidentiality of technical data and trade secrets submitted by actual or prospective bidders or offerors;

partial, progressive, and multiple awards;

storerooms and inventories, including determination of appropriate stock levels and the management of agency supplies;

transfer, sale, or other disposal of supplies;

definitions and classes of contractual services and procedures for acquiring them;

providing for conducting price analysis;

use of payment and performance bonds in connection with contracts for supplies, services, and construction;

guidelines for use of cost principles in negotiations, adjustments, and settlements;

conditions under which an agency may use the services of an employment program;

a bidder’s or offeror’s duties under this chapter; and

the elimination and prevention of discrimination in state contracting because of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, disability, or political affiliation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1989; am §§ 7, 8 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 72 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For source selection, see 2 AAC 12, art. 1.

For specifications, see 2 AAC 12, art. 2.

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

For competitive sealed proposals for architect, engineer, or land surveying, see 2 AAC 12, art. 5.

For small purchases, see 2 AAC 12, art. 6.

For single source procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 7.

For limited competition procurements, see 2 AAC 12, art. 8.

For emergency procurements, see 2 AAC 12, art. 9.

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

For innovative procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 11.

For supply management, see 2 AAC 12, art. 12.

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

For design-build construction contracts, see 2 AAC 12, art. 16.

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Sec. 36.30.050.
Lists of contractors. [Repealed, § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 36.30.060.
Specifications.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the preparation, revision, and content of specifications for supplies, services, professional services, and construction required by an agency. The commissioner shall monitor the use of these specifications.

Specifications for construction of highways must conform as closely as practicable to those adopted by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials.

The commissioner may obtain expert advice and assistance from personnel of using agencies in the development of specifications. Specifications must promote overall economy for the purposes intended and encourage competition in satisfying the state’s needs, and may not be unduly restrictive. The requirements of this subsection regarding the purposes and nonrestrictiveness of specifications apply to all specifications, including those prepared by architects, engineers, designers, and other professionals.

In this section, “specification” means a description of the physical or functional characteristics, or of the nature of a supply, service, professional service, or construction project; it may include requirements for licensing, inspecting, testing, and delivery.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For specifications, see 2 AAC 12, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

While the Alaska Energy Authority may execute contracts for construction of power projects, it probably cannot execute a project labor agreement that prefers the hire of employees who are members of a labor union (based upon the equal protection concern of favoring one group of similarly situated workers over another). But see
1999 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 12, which, based upon the decision in

Laborers Local # 942 v. Lampkin, 956 P.2d. 422 (Alaska 1998)

, rescinded the portion of this opinion which addressed the equal protection concerns raised by the use of project labor agreements. The portion of this opinion which addressed the possible illegality of project labor agreements under state procurement regulations remains in effect.
Jan. 19, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.30.070.
Supply management.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the

management of supplies during their entire life cycle;

sale, lease, or disposal of surplus supplies by public auction, competitive sealed bidding, or other appropriate method;

purchase of surplus supplies by an employee of the using or disposing agency; and

transfer of excess supplies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For supply management, see 2 AAC 12, art. 12.

Sec. 36.30.080.
Leases.

The department shall lease space for the use of the state or an agency wherever it is necessary and feasible, subject to compliance with the requirements of this chapter. A lease may not provide for a period of occupancy greater than 40 years. An agency requiring office, warehouse, or other space shall lease the space through the department.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 75 SLA 1994.]

If the department, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska, the legislative council, or the supreme court intends to enter into or renew a lease of real property with an annual rent to the department, University of Alaska, legislative council, or supreme court that is anticipated to exceed $500,000, or with total lease payments that exceed $2,500,000 for the full term of the lease, including any renewal options that are defined in the lease, the department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, or supreme court shall provide notice to the legislature. The notice must include the anticipated annual lease obligation amount and the total lease payments for the full term of the lease. The department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, and the supreme court may not enter into or renew a lease of real property

requiring notice under this subsection unless the proposed lease or renewal of a lease has been approved by the legislature by law; an appropriation for the rent payable during the initial period of the lease or the initial period of lease renewal constitutes approval of the proposed lease or renewal of a lease for purposes of this paragraph;

under this subsection if the total of all optional renewal periods provided for in the lease exceeds the original term of the lease exclusive of the total period of all renewal options.

When the department is evaluating proposals for a lease of space, the department shall consider, in addition to lease costs, the life cycle costs, function, indoor environment, public convenience, planning, design, appearance, and location of the proposed building.

When the department is considering leasing space, the department should consider whether leasing is likely to be the least costly means to provide the space.

When the department is acquiring leased space of 7,000 square feet or less, the department may procure the leased space using the procedures for small procurements under AS

36.30.320

, providing public notice is given to prospective offerors in the market area.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1990; am §§ 8, 9 ch 181 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 73 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1993; am §§ 6, 11 ch 75 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 58, SLA 1990 provides that the 1990 amendment to AS

36.30.080(c)

by § 1, ch. 58, SLA 1990 “applies to an agreement that is entered into on or after June 5, 1990, and does not apply to a lease or to the renewal of a lease if the lease is in existence on June 5, 1990.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Equipment-lease financing is covered by the procurement code and the statutory requirement of legislative approval.
Sept. 17, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.30.083.
Lease extensions authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska, the legislative council, or the court system may extend a real property lease that is entered into under this chapter for up to 10 years if a minimum cost savings of at least 10 percent below the market rental value of the real property at the time of the extension would be achieved on the rent due under the lease. The market rental value must be established by a real estate broker’s opinion of the rental value or by an appraisal of the rental value.

The department, the University of Alaska, the court system, and the Legislative Affairs Agency shall submit individually an annual report to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee detailing the leases extended and the cost savings achieved by that entity under (a) of this section. The reports are due August 31 of each year.

History.

(§ 11 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2004)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 89, SLA 2004 (HB 545), repealing and reenacting this section, see 2004 House Journal 3082 — 3084.

Sec. 36.30.085.
Lease-purchase agreements.

To perform its duties and statutory functions, the department, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska, the legislative council, or the supreme court may enter into lease-purchase agreements for real property. The department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, or the supreme court may enter into a lease-purchase agreement only if the department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, or the supreme court is the lessee under the agreement.

When evaluating proposals to acquire or improve real property under a lease-purchase agreement, the department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, or the supreme court shall consider

in addition to lease costs, the life cycle costs, function, indoor environment, public convenience, planning, design, appearance, and location of the real property proposed for acquisition or improvement; and

whether acquisition or improvement of the real property by lease-purchase agreement is likely to be the least costly means to provide the space.

A lease-purchase agreement

may not provide for a period of occupancy under the full term of the lease-purchase agreement that is greater than 40 years;

must provide that lease payments made by the department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, or the supreme court are subject to annual appropriation.

If the department, Board of Regents, legislative council, or supreme court intends to enter into or renew a lease-purchase agreement for real property, the department, Board of Regents, legislative council, or supreme court shall provide notice to the legislature. The notice must include the

anticipated total construction, acquisition, or other costs of the project;

anticipated annual amount of the rental obligation; and

total lease payments for the full term of the lease-purchase agreement.

The department, the Board of Regents, the legislative council, or the supreme court may not enter into a lease-purchase agreement to acquire or improve real property unless the agreement has been approved by the legislature by law.

The provisions of (d) and (e) of this section do not apply to a lease-purchase agreement

related to the refinancing of an outstanding balance owing on an existing lease-purchase agreement; or

by the University of Alaska if the lease-purchase agreement is secured by student fees or university receipts as defined in AS

14.40.491

.

In this section,

“full term of the lease-purchase agreement” includes all renewal options that are defined within the lease-purchase agreement;

“lease-purchase agreement” includes a lease-financing agreement.

History.

(§ 7 ch 75 SLA 1994; am §§ 2, 3 ch 36 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For approval under this section of a lease-purchase agreement for construction of a seafood and food safety laboratory facility, see §§ 2 and 3,
ch. 79, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.
For governor’s transmittal letter for that project, authorized by that Act (SB 215), see 2003 Senate Journal 1274 — 1275.

For approval under this section for lease-purchase agreements for correctional facilities, see § 5,
ch. 160, SLA 2004.

For approval under this section of a lease-purchase agreement for construction of a state virology laboratory facility, see §§ 5 and 6,
ch. 7, FSSLA 2005, and for a statement of legislative intent regarding the sources of money for that project, see § 1,
ch. 7, FSSLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.
For governor’s transmittal letter for that project, authorized by that Act (SB 73), see 2005 Senate Journal 109 — 111.

For approval under this section of a lease-purchase agreement to finance the purchase of a parking garage for the Atwood Office Building, see §§ 2 — 4,
ch. 47, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a legislative findings and purpose statement regarding that project, see § 1,
ch. 47, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.
For the governor’s transmittal letter for that project, authorized by that Act (SB 73), see 2006 Senate Journal 2980 — 2981.

For approval under this section of a lease-purchase agreement to finance construction of a residential housing facility and related pedestrian bridge to serve the Anchorage campus of the Alaska Native Medical Center, see secs. 2 — 3, ch. 63, SLA 2013, in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a legislative statement of intent regarding that project, see sec. 1, ch. 63, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 36.30.086.
Lease-purchase of personal property.

To perform its duties and statutory functions, an agency, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska, the legislative council, the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, the office of victims’ rights, the office of the ombudsman, or the supreme court may enter into lease-purchase agreements for the acquisition of equipment or other personal property. The government entity is the lessee under the agreement.

If a government entity enters into a lease-purchase agreement under (a) of this section that exceeds $100,000 in payments by the state, the government entity shall provide notice to the presiding officers and finance committee chairs of the house and senate. The notice must describe the property that is the subject of the agreement and must set out the terms of the lease-purchase.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2008)

Sec. 36.30.090.
Delivery of supplies. [Repealed, § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 36.30.095.
Procurement of paper. [Repealed, § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996.]